Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.240

Board of adjustment—Vacancies.

Vacancies in the board of adjustment shall be filled by appointment in the same manner in which the commissioners are appointed in RCW 36.70.080. Appointment shall be for the unexpired portion of the term.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.240. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 24.]